Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
VESTING OF CORPORATE POWERS

31-15-101. Municipalities bodies politic - powers.

Municipalities:

Shall be bodies politic and corporate, under such name as they are organized;

May sue or be sued;

May enter into contracts;

May acquire, hold, lease, and dispose of property, both real and personal;

May have a common seal which they may alter at their pleasure; and

May accept the transfer of federal land for public purposes, including but not limited to municipal expansion and residential purposes.

All such municipalities shall have the powers, authority, and privileges granted by this title and by any other law of this state together with such implied and incidental powers, authority, and privileges as may be reasonably necessary, proper, convenient, or useful to the exercise thereof. All such powers, authority, and privileges are subject to the restrictions and limitations provided for in this title and in any other law of this state.

Each municipality may coordinate, pursuant to 43 U.S.C. sec. 1712, the "National Environmental Policy Act of 1969", 42 U.S.C. sec. 4321 et seq., 40 U.S.C. sec. 3312, 16 U.S.C. sec. 530, 16 U.S.C. sec. 1604, and 40 CFR parts 1500 to 1508, with the United States secretary of the interior and the United States secretary of agriculture to develop management plans that address hazardous fuel removal and other forest management practices, water development and conservation measures, watershed protection, public utilities protection, private property protection, and the protection of air quality on federal lands within such municipality's jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1104, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 76:

(1)(f) added, p. 697, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2003:

(3) added, p. 1037, § 11, effective April 17.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-12-201 and 31-12-202 as they existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act enacting subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 145, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

31-15-102. Review without bond.

In all actions, suits, and proceedings in any court in this state in which a municipality of this state is a party, such municipality may take an appeal, as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules, without giving bond.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1105, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-19-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-103. Making of ordinances.

Municipalities shall have power to make and publish ordinances not inconsistent with the laws of this state, from time to time, for carrying into effect or discharging the powers and duties conferred by this title which are necessary and proper to provide for the safety, preserve the health, promote the prosperity, and improve the morals, order, comfort, and convenience of such municipality and the inhabitants thereof not inconsistent with the laws of this state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1105, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-301 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-104. Powers not exclusive.

The enumeration of the powers set forth in this title shall not be construed to limit the exercise of any other power granted to municipalities by the provisions of any other law of this state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1105, § 1, effective July 1.